Illinois, session 104th, HB4999.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Code is amended by changing Section 6-103.3 as 6follows: 7    (405 ILCS 5/6-103.3)8    Sec. 6-103.3. Clear and present danger; notice. If a 9person is determined to pose a clear and present danger to 10himself, herself, or to others by a physician, clinical 11psychologist, advanced practice psychiatric nurse, or 12qualified examiner, whether employed by the State, by any 13public or private mental health facility or part thereof, or 14by a law enforcement official or a school administrator, then 15the physician, clinical psychologist, advanced practice 16psychiatric nurse, or qualified examiner shall notify the 17Department of Human Services and a law enforcement official or 18school administrator shall notify the Illinois State Police, 19within 24 hours of making the determination that the person 20poses a clear and present danger. The Department of Human 21Services shall immediately update its records and information 22relating to mental health and developmental disabilities, and 23if appropriate, shall notify the Illinois State Police in a   HB4999- 2 -LRB104 18657 KTG 32100 b1form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. 2Information disclosed under this Section shall remain 3privileged and confidential, and shall not be redisclosed, 4except as required under subsection (e) of Section 3.1 of the 5Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, nor used for any other 6purpose. The method of providing this information shall 7guarantee that the information is not released beyond that 8which is necessary for the purpose of this Section and shall be 9provided by rule by the Department of Human Services. 10Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act or any other 11law to the contrary, the The identity of the person reporting 12under this Section shall not be disclosed to the subject of the 13report unless ordered by the Firearm Owner's Identification 14Card Review Board or a court with appropriate jurisdiction in 15accordance with Section 10 of the Firearm Owners 16Identification Card Act. The physician, clinical psychologist, 17advanced practice psychiatric nurse, qualified examiner, law 18enforcement official, or school administrator making the 19determination and his or her employer shall not be held 20criminally, civilly, or professionally liable for making or 21not making the notification required under this Section, 22except for willful or wanton misconduct. The Department of 23Human Services and its employees or agents shall not be held 24liable for damages in any civil action arising from the 25disclosure or non-disclosure of the information released to an 26individual in accordance with Section 10 of the Firearm Owners   HB4999- 3 -LRB104 18657 KTG 32100 b1Identification Card Act. This Section does not apply to a law 2enforcement official, if making the notification under this 3Section will interfere with an ongoing or pending criminal 4investigation.5    For the purposes of this Section:6        "Clear and present danger" has the meaning ascribed to 7    it in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners Identification 8    Card Act.9        "Determined to pose a clear and present danger to 10    himself, herself, or to others by a physician, clinical 11    psychologist, advanced practice psychiatric nurse, or 12    qualified examiner" means in the professional opinion of 13    the physician, clinical psychologist, advanced practice 14    psychiatric nurse, or qualified examiner, a person, with 15    whom the physician, psychologist, nurse, or examiner has a 16    formal relationship in his or her official capacity, poses 17    a clear and present danger. 18        "School administrator" means the person required to 19    report under the School Administrator Reporting of Mental 20    Health Clear and Present Danger Determinations Law.21(Source: P.A. 104-270, eff. 8-15-25.) 22    Section 10. The Mental Health and Developmental 23Disabilities Confidentiality Act is amended by changing 24Section 12 as follows:   HB4999- 4 -LRB104 18657 KTG 32100 b1    (740 ILCS 110/12)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 812)2    Sec. 12. (a) If the United States Secret Service or the 3Illinois State Police requests information from a mental 4health or developmental disability facility, as defined in 5Section 1-107 and 1-114 of the Mental Health and Developmental 6Disabilities Code, relating to a specific recipient and the 7facility director determines that disclosure of such 8information may be necessary to protect the life of, or to 9prevent the infliction of great bodily harm to, a public 10official, or a person under the protection of the United 11States Secret Service, only the following information may be 12disclosed: the recipient's name, address, and age and the date 13of any admission to or discharge from a facility; and any 14information which would indicate whether or not the recipient 15has a history of violence or presents a danger of violence to 16the person under protection. Any information so disclosed 17shall be used for investigative purposes only and shall not be 18publicly disseminated. Any person participating in good faith 19in the disclosure of such information in accordance with this 20provision shall have immunity from any liability, civil, 21criminal or otherwise, if such information is disclosed 22relying upon the representation of an officer of the United 23States Secret Service or the Illinois State Police that a 24person is under the protection of the United States Secret 25Service or is a public official.26    For the purpose of this subsection (a), the term "public   HB4999- 5 -LRB104 18657 KTG 32100 b1official" means the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney 2General, Secretary of State, State Comptroller, State 3Treasurer, member of the General Assembly, member of the 4United States Congress, Judge of the United States as defined 5in 28 U.S.C. 451, Justice of the United States as defined in 28 6U.S.C. 451, United States Magistrate Judge as defined in 28 7U.S.C. 639, Bankruptcy Judge appointed under 28 U.S.C. 152, or 8Supreme, Appellate, Circuit, or Associate Judge of the State 9of Illinois. The term shall also include the spouse, child or 10children of a public official.11    (b) The Department of Human Services (acting as successor 12to the Department of Mental Health and Developmental 13Disabilities) and all public or private hospitals and mental 14health facilities are required, as hereafter described in this 15subsection, to furnish the Illinois State Police only such 16information as may be required for the sole purpose of 17determining whether an individual who may be or may have been a 18patient is disqualified because of that status from receiving 19or retaining a Firearm Owner's Identification Card or falls 20within the federal prohibitors under subsection (e), (f), (g), 21(r), (s), or (t) of Section 8 of the Firearm Owners 22Identification Card Act, or falls within the federal 23prohibitors in 18 U.S.C. 922(g) and (n). All physicians, 24clinical psychologists, or qualified examiners at public or 25private mental health facilities or parts thereof as defined 26in this subsection shall, in the form and manner required by   HB4999- 6 -LRB104 18657 KTG 32100 b1the Department, provide notice directly to the Department of 2Human Services, or to his or her employer who shall then report 3to the Department, within 24 hours after determining that a 4person poses a clear and present danger to himself, herself, 5or others, or within 7 days after a person 14 years or older is 6determined to be a person with a developmental disability by a 7physician, clinical psychologist, or qualified examiner as 8described in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners Identification 9Card Act. If a person is a patient as described in clause (1) 10of the definition of "patient" in Section 1.1 of the Firearm 11Owners Identification Card Act, this information shall be 12furnished within 7 days after admission to a public or private 13hospital or mental health facility or the provision of 14services. Any such information disclosed under this subsection 15shall remain privileged and confidential, and shall not be 16redisclosed, except as required by subsection (e) of Section 173.1 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, nor 18utilized for any other purpose. The method of requiring the 19providing of such information shall guarantee that no 20information is released beyond what is necessary for this 21purpose. In addition, the information disclosed shall be 22provided by the Department within the time period established 23by Section 24-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012 regarding the 24delivery of firearms. The method used shall be sufficient to 25provide the necessary information within the prescribed time 26period, which may include periodically providing lists to the   HB4999- 7 -LRB104 18657 KTG 32100 b1Department of Human Services or any public or private hospital 2or mental health facility of Firearm Owner's Identification 3Card applicants on which the Department or hospital shall 4indicate the identities of those individuals who are to its 5knowledge disqualified from having a Firearm Owner's 6Identification Card for reasons described herein. The 7Department may provide for a centralized source of information 8for the State on this subject under its jurisdiction. 9Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act or any other 10law to the contrary, the The identity of the person reporting 11under this subsection shall not be disclosed to the subject of 12the report unless ordered by the Firearm Owner's 13Identification Card Review Board or a court with appropriate 14jurisdiction in accordance with Section 10 of the Firearm 15Owners Identification Card Act. For the purposes of this 16subsection, the physician, clinical psychologist, or qualified 17examiner making the determination and his or her employer 18shall not be held criminally, civilly, or professionally 19liable for making or not making the notification required 20under this subsection, except for willful or wanton 21misconduct. The Department of Human Services and its employees 22or agents shall not be held liable for damages in any civil 23action arising from the disclosure or non-disclosure of the 24information released to an individual in accordance with 25Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act. 26    Any person, institution, or agency, under this Act,   HB4999- 8 -LRB104 18657 KTG 32100 b1participating in good faith in the reporting or disclosure of 2records and communications otherwise in accordance with this 3provision or with rules, regulations or guidelines issued by 4the Department shall have immunity from any liability, civil, 5criminal or otherwise, that might result by reason of the 6action. For the purpose of any proceeding, civil or criminal, 7arising out of a report or disclosure in accordance with this 8provision, the good faith of any person, institution, or 9agency so reporting or disclosing shall be presumed. The full 10extent of the immunity provided in this subsection (b) shall 11apply to any person, institution or agency that fails to make a 12report or disclosure in the good faith belief that the report 13or disclosure would violate federal regulations governing the 14confidentiality of alcohol and drug abuse patient records 15implementing 42 U.S.C. 290dd-3 and 290ee-3.16    For purposes of this subsection (b) only, the following 17terms shall have the meaning prescribed:18        (1) (Blank).19        (1.3) "Clear and present danger" has the meaning as 20    defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 21    Identification Card Act. 22        (1.5) "Person with a developmental disability" has the 23    meaning as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 24    Identification Card Act.25        (2) "Patient" has the meaning as defined in Section 26    1.1 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.  HB4999- 9 -LRB104 18657 KTG 32100 b1        (3) "Mental health facility" has the meaning as 2    defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 3    Identification Card Act. 4    (c) Upon the request of a peace officer who takes a person 5into custody and transports such person to a mental health or 6developmental disability facility pursuant to Section 3-606 or 74-404 of the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code 8or who transports a person from such facility, a facility 9director shall furnish said peace officer the name, address, 10age and name of the nearest relative of the person transported 11to or from the mental health or developmental disability 12facility. In no case shall the facility director disclose to 13the peace officer any information relating to the diagnosis, 14treatment or evaluation of the person's mental or physical 15health.16    For the purposes of this subsection (c), the terms "mental 17health or developmental disability facility", "peace officer" 18and "facility director" shall have the meanings ascribed to 19them in the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code.20    (d) Upon the request of a peace officer or prosecuting 21authority who is conducting a bona fide investigation of a 22criminal offense, or attempting to apprehend a fugitive from 23justice, a facility director may disclose whether a person is 24present at the facility. Upon request of a peace officer or 25prosecuting authority who has a valid forcible felony warrant 26issued, a facility director shall disclose: (1) whether the   HB4999- 10 -LRB104 18657 KTG 32100 b1person who is the subject of the warrant is present at the 2facility and (2) the date of that person's discharge or future 3discharge from the facility. The requesting peace officer or 4prosecuting authority must furnish a case number and the 5purpose of the investigation or an outstanding arrest warrant 6at the time of the request. Any person, institution, or agency 7participating in good faith in disclosing such information in 8accordance with this subsection (d) is immune from any 9liability, civil, criminal or otherwise, that might result by 10reason of the action.11(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)